src/fst/stems/adverb.lexc
LEXICON Adverbs
   ikke Adverb_Reg ; !not
   ut Adverb_Reg ; !out
   oft Adverb_ative ; !often/frequently
   mest Adverb_Reg ; !most
   over Adverb_Reg ; !over, across
   trolig Adverb_Reg ; !probably, presumably
   der Adverb_Reg ; !there
   da Adverb_Reg ; !then
   så Adverb_Reg ; !so, as
   opp Adverb_Reg ; !up
   fram Adverb_Reg ; !forward

LEXICON Adverb_Reg
    +Adv: # ;

LEXICON Adverb_ative
    +Adv+Com:ere # ;
    +Adv+Sup:est # ;
    
